California, session 20252026, AB2199.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4401 of the Probate Code is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 4401 is added to the Probate Code, to read:4401. The following statutory form power of attorney is legally sufficient when the requirements of Section 4402 are satisfied:UNIFORM STATUTORY FORM POWER OF ATTORNEY(California Probate Code Section 4401)NOTICE: THE POWERS GRANTED BY THIS DOCUMENT ARE BROAD AND SWEEPING. THEY ARE EXPLAINED IN THE UNIFORM STATUTORY FORM POWER OF ATTORNEY ACT (CALIFORNIA PROBATE CODE SECTIONS 4400-4466). THE POWERS LISTED IN THIS DOCUMENT DO NOT INCLUDE ALL POWERS THAT ARE AVAILABLE UNDER THE PROBATE CODE. ADDITIONAL POWERS AVAILABLE UNDER THE PROBATE CODE MAY BE ADDED BY SPECIFICALLY LISTING THEM UNDER THE SPECIAL INSTRUCTIONS SECTION OF THIS DOCUMENT. IF YOU HAVE ANY QUESTIONS ABOUT THESE POWERS, OBTAIN COMPETENT LEGAL ADVICE. THIS DOCUMENT DOES NOT AUTHORIZE ANYONE TO MAKE MEDICAL AND OTHER HEALTH-CARE DECISIONS FOR YOU. YOU MAY REVOKE THIS POWER OF ATTORNEY IF YOU LATER WISH TO DO SO.APPOINTMENT OF AGENTI, (your name and address), appoint:(name and address of the person appointed, or of each person appointed if you want to designate more than one) as my agent (attorney-in-fact) to act for me in any lawful way with respect to the powers granted hereinOPTIONAL APPOINTMENT OF SUCCESSOR AGENT◻If any agentOR◻If all agents named above are unable or unwilling to act as my agent, I appoint:         (name and address of the person appointed, or of each person         appointed if you want to designate more than one) as my successor          agent(s) to act for me in any lawful way with respect to the powers         granted herein. EXERCISE OF POWER WHERE MORE THAN ONE AGENT DESIGNATEDIf I have designated more than one agent, the agents:   ◻may act separatelyOR◻must act jointly IF YOU APPOINTED MORE THAN ONE AGENT AND YOU WANT EACH AGENT TO BE ABLE TO ACT ALONE WITHOUT THE OTHER AGENT(S) JOINING, MARK THE BOX BEFORE THE WORDS “MAY ACT SEPARATELY” ABOVE. IF YOU MARK THE BOX BEFORE THE WORDS “MUST ACT JOINTLY” OR IF YOU FAIL TO MARK EITHER BOX, THEN ALL OF YOUR AGENTS MUST ACT OR SIGN TOGETHER.GENERAL POWERS GRANTEDTO GRANT ALL OF THE FOLLOWING POWERS, INITIAL THE LINE IN FRONT OF (N) AND IGNORE THE LINES IN FRONT OF THE OTHER POWERS.TO GRANT ONE OR MORE, BUT FEWER THAN ALL, OF THE FOLLOWING POWERS, INITIAL THE LINE IN FRONT OF EACH POWER YOU ARE GRANTING.TO WITHHOLD A POWER, DO NOT INITIAL THE LINE IN FRONT OF IT. YOU MAY, BUT NEED NOT, CROSS OUT EACH POWER WITHHELD.INITIAL________(A)Real property transactions________(B)Tangible personal property transactions________(C)Stock and bond transactions________(D)Commodity and option transactions________(E)Banking and other financial institution transactions________(F)Business operating transactions________(G)Insurance and annuity transactions________(H)Estate, trust, and other beneficiary transactions________(I)Claims and litigation________(J)Personal and family maintenance________(K)Benefits from social security, Medicare, Medicaid, or other governmental programs, or civil or military service________(L)Retirement plan transactions________(M)Tax matters________(N)All of the powers listed aboveYOU NEED NOT INITIAL ANY OTHER LINES ABOVE IF YOU INITIAL LINE (N).ADDITIONAL POWERS REGARDING DIGITAL ASSETSTO GRANT ALL OF THE FOLLOWING POWERS REGARDING DIGITAL ASSETS, INITIAL THE LINE IN FRONT OF (Q) AND IGNORE THE LINES IN FRONT OF LINE (O) AND LINE (P).TO GRANT ONLY ONE OF THE FOLLOWING POWERS, INITIAL THE LINE IN FRONT OF THE POWER YOU ARE GRANTING.TO WITHHOLD A POWER, DO NOT INITIAL THE LINE IN FRONT OF IT. YOU MAY, BUT NEED NOT, CROSS OUT EACH POWER WITHHELD.FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ON THESE POWERS, REFER TO SECTION 4466 OF THE PROBATE CODE AND THE REVISED UNIFORM FIDUCIARY ACCESS TO DIGITAL ASSETS ACT (PART 20 (COMMENCING WITH SECTION 870) OF DIVISION 2 OF THE PROBATE CODE).IF YOU HAVE PROVIDED OTHER DIRECTIONS REGARDING ACCESS TO DIGITAL ASSETS IN A TERMS-OF-SERVICE AGREEMENT WITH THE CUSTODIAN OR THE ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATIONS SERVICE PROVIDER, THOSE DIRECTIONS MAY SUPERSEDE THESE.________(O)Authority over digital assets (which, if only this line is initialed in this section, includes access to a catalogue of electronic communications, but not the content of electronic communications sent or received)________(P)Authority over the content of electronic communications sent or received________(Q)Both of the powers listed aboveYOU NEED NOT INITIAL LINE (O) OR LINE (P) ABOVE IF YOU INITIAL LINE (Q).SPECIAL INSTRUCTIONS:ON THE FOLLOWING LINES YOU MAY GIVE SPECIAL INSTRUCTIONS LIMITING OR EXTENDING THE POWERS GRANTED TO YOUR AGENT(S).(Add additional sheets if needed.)UNLESS YOU DIRECT OTHERWISE ABOVE, THIS POWER OF ATTORNEY IS EFFECTIVE IMMEDIATELY AND WILL CONTINUE UNTIL IT IS REVOKED.This power of attorney will continue to be effective even though I become incapacitated.STRIKE THE PRECEDING SENTENCE IF YOU DO NOT WANT THIS POWER OF ATTORNEY TO CONTINUE IF YOU BECOME INCAPACITATED.OPTIONAL NOMINATION OF CONSERVATOR OF MY ESTATE◻If I mark this box, I nominate my agent(s) or co-agents, in the order designated in this form, to be appointed as the conservator or co-conservators of my estate if one needs to be appointed for me by a court.NOTICE TO THIRD PARTIESAny third party who receives a copy of this document may act under it. A third party may seek identification from my agents to prove their identity. Revocation of the power of attorney is not effective as to a third party until the third party has actual knowledge of the revocation. I agree to indemnify the third party for any claims that arise against the third party because of reliance on this power of attorney. This power of attorney is enforceable pursuant to Probate Code Section 4406.Signed thisday of , 20 ____.(Your signature)State of County ofBY ACCEPTING OR ACTING UNDER THE APPOINTMENT, THE AGENT ASSUMES THE FIDUCIARY AND OTHER LEGAL RESPONSIBILITIES OF AN AGENT.[Include certificate of acknowledgment of notary public in compliance with Section 1189 of the Civil Code or other applicable law.]SEC. 3. Section 4466 is added to the Probate Code, to read:4466. In a statutory form power of attorney, the language granting powers with respect to digital assets, catalogue of electronic communications, and content of electronic communications has the same meanings as set forth in the Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act (Part 20 (commencing with Section 870) of Division 2).